Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Capital gains on the sale of principal residence. new text end new text begin The amount of gain from the sale of a principal residence in excess of the $250,000 or $500,000 limit in section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code is a subtraction. For the purposes of this subdivision, "principal residence" means a property that qualifies for the exclusion from gross income under section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end